Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8007
Claims processing functions; delegation; requirements.

If an insurer delegates its claims processing functions to a third party, the delegation agreement shall provide that the third party shall consent to an examination and cooperate with that examination by the director and shall comply with the requirements of the Health Care Prompt Payment Act. Any delegation by the insurer shall not be construed to limit the insurer's responsibility to comply with the act.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 7.